Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 21. Industrial Hemp

§ 35-7-2101.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2102.
Industrial hemp authorized as agricultural crop. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2103.
Industrial hemp licensing. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2104.
Industrial hemp seed certification; power of department to examine seeds; purchase of samples; authority to make rules; fees and disposition thereof. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 108, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-7-2105.
Industrial hemp production reporting requirements. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2106.
Enforcement; compliance; penalties. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2107.
Rulemaking authority. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2108.
Disposition of fees. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-2109.
Affirmative defense for possession or cultivation of marijuana. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.